Missouri, session 2026, HB2008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever chargeable to the fund designated, for the period
beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
PART 1
Section 8.000. Each appropriation in this act shall consist of the item or
items in each section of Part 1 of this act, for the amount and
purpose and from the fund designated in each section of Part 1,
as well as all additional clarifications of purpose in Part 2 of this
act that make reference by section to said item or items in Part 1.
Any clarification of purpose in Part 2 shall state the section or
sections in Part 1 to which it attaches and shall, together with the

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 2
language of said section(s) in Part 1, form the complete statement
of purpose of the appropriation. As such, the provisions of Part
2 of this act shall not be severed from Part 1, and if any
clarification of purpose in Part 2 is for any reason held to be
invalid, such decision shall invalidate all of the appropriations in
this act of which said clarification of purpose is a part. Part 3 of
this act shall consist of guidance to the Department of Public
Safety in implementing the appropriations found in Part 1 and
Part 2 of this act. An appropriation may be comprised in whole
or in part of a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall
be construed to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the
stated appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation
identified as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an
addition to any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal
periods beyond June 30, 2027. Any amount identified as one-
time may, however, be requested in any future fiscal period as a
new decision item.
Section 8.005. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,907,347
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 250,208
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,157,555
Personal Service ..................................................................................................471,978
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 225,000
From Justice Assistance Grant Fund (1782) ...................................................................696,978
Personal Service (including $50,000 one-time) ..................................................491,019
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 420,155
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................911,174
Personal Service ....................................................................................................95,374
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,164
From Services to Victims Fund (1592) ...........................................................................105,538
Personal Service ..................................................................................................693,869
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 153,843

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 3
From Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund (1681) .........................................................847,712
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Crime Prevention Information and Programming Fund
(1253) ......................................................................................................................1,000
Expense and Equipment
From Antiterrorism Fund (1759) ......................................................................................15,000
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,694,524
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 21,600,371
From Department of Public Safety Federal Homeland Security Fund
(1193) .............................................................................................................23,294,895
Personal Service ..................................................................................................118,998
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,213,000
From MODEX Fund (1867) ........................................................................................1,331,998
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies, provided
the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of any new
funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended, in
writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
Personal Service ..................................................................................................168,331
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,155,000
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .................................... 9,323,331
Total (Not to exceed 84.03 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$39,685,181
Section 8.006. To the Department of Public Safety
For grants to local city and county fire, ambulance, and law enforcement
entities that provide emergency services within the Region B area
to update radio and other communications equipment, provided
no local match is required
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$800,000
For construction and improvements to a jail located in any county with
more than fifteen thousand seven hundred but fewer than
seventeen thousand six hundred inhabitants and with a county
seat with more than three thousand but fewer than three thousand
six hundred inhabitants

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 4
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................100,000
To any city with more than one hundred twenty-five thousand but
fewer than one hundred sixty thousand inhabitants for the
purpose of funding public safety initiatives in a downtown
community improvement district
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,900,000
Section 8.007. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For grants to defray the costs of security enhancements or measures for
eligible nonprofit organizations as provided in Section 650.910,
RSMo
Program Distribution
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$500,000
Section 8.008. To the Department of Public Safety
For weather radar systems to be installed in a city with more than seven
thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants and located
in a county with more than twenty-five thousand but fewer than
thirty thousand inhabitants or a city with more than six hundred
eighty but fewer than seven hundred sixty inhabitants and that is
the county seat of a county with more than five thousand but
fewer than six thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .......................................................$2,000,000
Section 8.010. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For drug task force grants, provided three percent (3%) be allowed for
grant administration
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$78,786
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,099,892
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 0.02 F.T.E.) ............................$3,178,678
Section 8.015. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For scholarships for individuals to attend law enforcement academies
Expense and Equipment

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 5
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
For grants to local law enforcement to support equipment and training
needs, provided that a minimum of 35% shall be distributed to
law enforcement agencies within third class counties
Personal Service ....................................................................................................70,000
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,000,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,070,000
For the Missouri violent crime clearance grant program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 2,000,000
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$14,070,000
Section 8.020. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Juvenile Justice Delinquency Prevention Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ..........................................$1,022,492
Section 8.025. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the establishment and enhancement of local violent crime prevention
programs in Missouri communities and improving the quality of
crime data reporting in compliance with the National Incident-
Based Reporting System
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 8.030. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the FIFA World Cup Grant Program
Program Distribution
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) (one-time) ......................$59,522,190
Section 8.031. To the Department of Public Safety
For a school safety platform that enables schools and first responders to
share actionable information instantly, analyze risk, and make
informed decisions, improving prevention, response, and overall
safety outcomes in compliance with Section 160.480
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,900,000
Section 8.035. To the Department of Public Safety

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 6
For the Office of the Director
For a statewide, competitively bid school safety program
From Budget Stabilization Fund (1522) .......................................................................$449,983
Section 8.040. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Counter-Unmanned Aircraft Systems Grant Program
Personal Service ................................................................................................$207,000
Program Distribution ............................................................................... 13,983,568
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ........................................$14,190,568
Section 8.045. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Narcotics Control Assistance Program and multi-jurisdictional
task forces
From Justice Assistance Grant Fund (1782) ..............................................................$4,490,000
Section 8.050. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the 988
Public Safety Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$555,122
Section 8.055. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the purpose of providing services for peace officers and first
responders to assist in coping with stress and potential
psychological trauma resulting from a response to a critical
incident or emotionally difficult event
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ...................................$250,000
Personal Service ....................................................................................................53,239
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 503,511
From 988 Public Safety Fund (1864)................................................................... 556,750
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) .................................................................................$806,750
Section 8.060. To the Department of Public Safety
For any entities providing security and/or other services for the 2026
World Cup

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 7
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)
(one-time) ..........................................................................................................$250,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $1,750,000 one-time) ...................11,750,000
For distribution to any city with more than one hundred five thousand
but fewer than one hundred twenty-five thousand inhabitants for
emergency services related to the 2026 World Cup for overtime
for police, fire, emergency operations, communications, and
emergency dispatch services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ............................................................500,000
For distribution to any city with more than thirty thousand but fewer than
thirty-three thousand inhabitants and located in a county with
more than seven hundred thousand but fewer than eight hundred
thousand inhabitants for emergency services related to the 2026
World Cup for overtime for police, fire, emergency operations,
communications, and emergency dispatch services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ................................................. 100,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$12,600,000
Section 8.065. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For statewide fentanyl testing of water at schools, provided that the
Department of Public Safety shall track and report certain metrics
regarding the testing program, including but not limited to:
schools tested and associated school districts, fentanyl amounts
recorded at each school, and subsequent fentanyl use prevention
strategies enacted by tested schools
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ................................$4,000,000
For statewide fentanyl and additional dangerous narcotics testing of
wastewater for law enforcement activities
From General Revenue (1101)............................................................................. 1,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$5,000,000
Section 8.070. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Missouri Sheriff Methamphetamine Relief Taskforce

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 8
For supplementing deputy sheriffs' salary and related employment
benefits pursuant to Section 57.278, RSMo
From Deputy Sheriff Salary Supplementation Fund (1913) ......................................$5,000,000
For grants to support sheriff deputies working in conjunction with the
Missouri State Highway Patrol
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,250,000
Section 8.075. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For operating grants to local law enforcement cybercrimes task forces,
provided three percent (3%) is allowed for grant administration
and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 8.335
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$69,494
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,447,129
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,516,623
Section 8.080. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
To provide financial assistance to the spouses, children, and other
dependents of any local law enforcement officers, paramedics,
emergency medical technicians, corrections officers, and/or
firefighters who have lost their lives performing their duties.
Deaths from natural causes, illnesses, or injuries are outside the
program's scope, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$70,000
Section 8.085. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Services to Victims Program, provided three percent (3%) of
each grant award be allowed for the administrative expenses of
each grantee
From Services to Victims Fund (1592) ......................................................................$2,000,000
Section 8.090. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Violence Against Women Program

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 9
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ..........................................$3,294,343
Section 8.095. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
For the Crime Victims' Compensation Program
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,900,000
From Department of Public Safety Crime Victims Federal Fund (1191) ....................4,500,000
From Crime Victims’ Compensation Fund (1681) ......................................................4,837,329
Personal Service ....................................................................................................75,348
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 160,000
From Department of Public Safety Crime Victims Federal Fund (1191) .......................235,348
For reimbursing SAFE-Care providers for performing forensic medical
exams on children suspected of having been physically abused
Personal Service ....................................................................................................44,534
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,402,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 1,446,534
Total (Not to exceed 1.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$13,919,211
Section 8.100. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Pretrial
Witness Protection Services Fund
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$75,000
Section 8.105. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For witness protection services
From Pretrial Witness Protection Services Fund (1868) ...........................................$2,000,000
Section 8.110. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the National Forensic Sciences Improvement Act Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .............................................$376,000
Section 8.115. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the State Forensic Laboratory Program

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 10
From State Forensic Laboratory Fund (1591) ..............................................................$360,000
Section 8.120. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For the Residential Substance Abuse Treatment Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .............................................$742,000
Section 8.125. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For peace officer training
From Peace Officer Standards and Training Commission Fund (1281).......................$700,000
Section 8.130. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Capitol Police, provided that not more than five percent (5%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment and further provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,721,073
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 170,058
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 46.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,891,131
Section 8.135. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Administration, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ................................................................................................$394,927
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 20,407
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................415,334
Personal Service .............................................................................................10,849,401
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,356,322
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................14,205,723
Personal Service ....................................................................................................52,614
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 26,953
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ..........................................................................79,567
Personal Service ......................................................................................................4,905
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,980
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .........................................................................18,885

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 11
For the High-Intensity Drug Trafficking Area Program
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................2,598,000
For a peer support program for law enforcement and first responders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 140,000
Total (Not to exceed 133.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,457,509
Section 8.140. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees' Retirement System, and insurance premiums,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$22,072,386
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,975,064
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................24,047,450
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,803,194
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 248,100
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................5,051,294
Personal Service ....................................................................................................44,654
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 505,931
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................550,585
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,891,285
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 153,784
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) ....................................................................2,045,069
Personal Service ..................................................................................................370,605
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 29,936
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................400,541
Personal Service ...........................................................................................112,717,448
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 9,275,876
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................121,993,324
Personal Service ...............................................................................................4,435,144
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 338,264

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 12
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ...............................................................4,773,408
Personal Service ..................................................................................................124,780
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 13,531
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674) ................................................................138,311
Personal Service ......................................................................................................5,766
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 889
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695) ...........................................................................................6,655
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,102
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 7,132
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772) .....................................................................88,234
Personal Service ....................................................................................................90,056
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 6,527
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) .........................................................96,583
Personal Service ....................................................................................................94,880
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,104
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) .................................................... 104,984
Total .......................................................................................................................$159,296,438
Section 8.145. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Enforcement Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,261,832
Expense and Equipment (including $214,814 one-time) ........................ 1,921,204
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,183,036
Personal Service ...........................................................................................105,874,709
Expense and Equipment (including $192,500 one-time) ......................... 9,734,849
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .......................115,609,558
Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in compliance
with the United States Department of Justice Equitable Sharing
Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194) ........................................................................800,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 13
Personal Service
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ....................................................................21,682
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) (including $27,500 one-time) ........................632,275
Personal Service ....................................................................................................10,106
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 457,510
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695) .......................................................................................467,616
Expense and Equipment
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) .......................................................245,242
Personal Service
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .......................................................................240,435
For the Governor's Security Detail
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,615,652
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies, provided
the General Assembly shall be notified of the source of any new
funds and the purpose for which they shall be expended, in
writing, prior to the expenditure of said funds
Personal Service ...............................................................................................6,320,839
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 5,729,322
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ..........................................12,050,161
For a statewide interoperable communication system
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................8,971,835
For a public order unit program
Expense and Equipment
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 300,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,187.00 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$147,137,492

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 14
Section 8.146. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Division of Drug and Crime Control, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$14,810,952
Expense and Equipment (including $203,278 one-time) ......................... 1,342,366
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................16,153,318
Personal Service ................................................................................................$209,352
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 126,979
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................336,331
For the Digital Forensic Center
Personal Service ..................................................................................................857,592
Expense and Equipment (including $108,460 one-time) ......................... 112,730
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................970,322
For the Special Victims Unit
Personal Service ..................................................................................................670,560
Expense and Equipment (including $136,369 one-time) ......................... 160,372
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 830,932
Total (Not to exceed 162.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$18,290,903
Section 8.150. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Water Patrol Division, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$5,332,959
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 225,006
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................5,557,965
Personal Service ..................................................................................................397,226
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,250,590
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................2,647,816
Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in compliance
with the United States Department of Justice Equitable Sharing
Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1194) ..........................................................................16,499

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 15
For the Water Patrol Division
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,516,091
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,581,587
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) ............................................................ 4,097,678
Total (Not to exceed 79.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,319,958
Section 8.155. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For purchase of vehicles, aircraft, and watercraft for the State Highway
Patrol and the Gaming Commission in accordance with Section
43.265, RSMo, also for maintenance and repair costs for vehicles,
provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 8.335
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $674,296 one-time) .......................$1,063,097
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644)
(including $147,140 one-time).........................................................................8,470,215
From Highway Patrol’s Motor Vehicle, Aircraft, and Watercraft
Revolving Fund (1695) (including $73,570 one-time) ....................................9,787,018
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 606,890
Total .........................................................................................................................$19,927,220
Section 8.157. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For fuel expenses for State Highway Patrol vehicles, including aircraft
and Gaming Commission vehicles, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$783,007
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................7,027,500
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 1,029,089
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,839,596
Section 8.160. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Crime Labs, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from
this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,444,475
Expense and Equipment (including $324,150 one-time) ......................... 1,714,086

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 16
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,158,561
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,880,229
Expense and Equipment (including $425,850 one-time) ......................... 2,126,166
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................8,006,395
Personal Service ....................................................................................................85,895
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,478,305
From DNA Profiling Analysis Fund (1772) ................................................................1,564,200
Personal Service ..................................................................................................297,770
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 900,071
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................1,197,841
Personal Service ..................................................................................................456,080
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,575
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ..................................................................458,655
Expense and Equipment
From State Forensic Laboratory Fund (1591) ..................................................... 357,633
Total (Not to exceed 136.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,743,285
Section 8.165. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the Law Enforcement Academy, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$235,414
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .................................................59,687
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ..........................................................................69,440
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,245,469
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 77,476
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ...........................2,322,945
Personal Service ..................................................................................................153,050

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 17
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 581,730
From Highway Patrol Academy Fund (1674) ..................................................... 734,780
Total (Not to exceed 37.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,422,266
Section 8.170. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Vehicle and Driver Safety
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) .............................................$350,000
Personal Service .............................................................................................15,202,840
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,190,359
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................16,393,199
Personal Service ..................................................................................................165,400
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 360,632
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) .................................................... 526,032
Total (Not to exceed 299.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,269,231
Section 8.175. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For refunding unused motor vehicle inspection stickers
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ............................$100,000
Section 8.180. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For Technical Services, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service ................................................................................................$318,160
Expense and Equipment (including $323,687 one-time) ......................... 2,203,508
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,521,668
Personal Service ..................................................................................................586,942
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,995,288
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ............................................5,582,230
Personal Service .............................................................................................20,791,808
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 22,848,458
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................43,640,266

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 18
Personal Service ...............................................................................................5,019,054
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,235,117
For National Criminal Record Reviews ............................................................... 3,000,000
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) .............................................................10,254,171
For Livescan purchases, Livescan lease agreements in full, and Livescan
maintenance costs incurred by local and county law enforcement
From Criminal Record System Fund (1671) ...............................................................1,715,000
Personal Service
From Highway Patrol Traffic Records Fund (1758) .......................................................104,878
Expense and Equipment
From Criminal Justice Network and Technology Revolving Fund
(1842) ...............................................................................................................2,819,050
Personal Service
From Veterans, Health, and Community Reinvestment Fund (1608) ............................493,220
Expense and Equipment
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ........................................................................233,721
For body worn cameras and related data storage for the Missouri State
Highway Patrol and Capitol Police
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................277,031
From Water Patrol Division Fund (1400) .......................................................................120,051
Personal Service ....................................................................................................81,979
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,080,460
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 1,162,439
Total (Not to exceed 362.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$68,923,725
Section 8.185. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Highway Patrol
For the recoupment, receipt, and disbursement of funds for equipment
replacement, and expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Highway Patrol Expense Fund (1793) ..................................................................$35,000
For mental health services for members of the Patrol

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 19
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 250,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$285,000
Section 8.190. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Road Fund pursuant to Section 307.365, RSMo
From Highway Patrol Inspection Fund (1297) ..........................................................$2,000,000
Section 8.195. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control
Personal Service ................................................................................................$547,744
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 397,594
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................945,338
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,474,273
Expense and Equipment (including $154,752 one-time) ......................... 817,459
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) ............................ 3,291,732
Total (Not to exceed 42.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$4,237,070
Section 8.200. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control
For refunds for unused liquor and beer licenses and for liquor and beer
stamps not used and canceled
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$55,000
Section 8.201. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
General Revenue Fund
From Division of Alcohol and Tobacco Control Fund (1544) (one-time) ................$2,000,000
Section 8.205. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety, provided for all funds in this section, five
percent (5%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to
expense and equipment and three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,053,592
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 188,729
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,242,321

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 20
For receiving and expending National Fire Academy Grants and
Assistance to Firefighter Grants
From Department of Public Safety Federal Fund (1152) ...............................................600,000
Personal Service ..................................................................................................545,809
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 74,713
From Elevator Safety Fund (1257) .................................................................................620,522
Personal Service ..................................................................................................757,003
Expense and Equipment (including $91,800 one-time) ........................... 603,317
From Boiler and Pressure Vessels Safety Fund (1744) ...............................................1,360,320
Personal Service ..................................................................................................113,335
Expense and Equipment (including $59,500 one-time) ........................... 71,527
From Missouri Explosives Safety Act Administration Fund (1804) ..............................184,862
To allow the State Fire Marshal to disburse grants to any applying
volunteer fire protection association for the purpose of funding
such association's costs related to worker's compensation
premiums for volunteer firefighters
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 75,000
Total (Not to exceed 70.92 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$6,083,025
Section 8.210. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety provided five percent (5%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment
For the Fire Safe Cigarette Program
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$28,224
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 10,204
From Cigarette Fire Safety Standard and Firefighter Protection Act Fund
(1937) ..................................................................................................................$38,428
Section 8.215. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Division of Fire Safety
For firefighter training contracted services, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587) .................................................100,000
From Fire Education Fund (1821) ....................................................................... 250,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,350,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 21
Section 8.220. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For Administration and Service to Veterans
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,485,350
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,822,643
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .......................8,307,993
Expense and Equipment
From Veterans’ Trust Fund (1579) ...................................................................................23,832
For housing assistance for veterans
Program Distribution
From Veterans Reinvestment Fund (1611) (one-time) ........................................ 500,000
Total (Not to exceed 115.61 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$8,831,825
Section 8.225. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For the restoration, renovation, maintenance, and improvements to a
World War I Memorial and Museum
From World War I Memorial Trust Fund (1993) .........................................................$150,000
Section 8.230. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For veterans' health and safety initiatives
From Veterans Assistance Fund (1461) .....................................................................$4,557,800
Section 8.231. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans’ Commission
For a grant to a veteran-only, non-profit homeless shelter that provides
emergency housing and a transitional living program to veterans
and such shelter is located in a city with more than one hundred
twenty-five thousand but fewer than one hundred sixty thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) ..........................................................$300,000
Section 8.235. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For the Veterans' Service Officer Program
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) .....................$1,600,740

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 22
Section 8.240. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For Missouri Veterans' Homes
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$88,968,807
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 30,113,801
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ........................................................119,082,608
Expense and Equipment
From Veterans’ Trust Fund (1579) ...................................................................................52,528
Expense and Equipment
From Department of Public Safety Federal Stimulus - 2021 Fund (2458) ..................7,651,047
Personal Service
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ............................39,211
For refunds to veterans and/or the U.S. Department of Veterans' Affairs
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) ............................................................1,274,400
For overtime to state employees. Non-exempt state employees identified
by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any remaining
funds being used to pay overtime to any other state employees
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) .................................................... 2,176,346
Total (Not to exceed 1,595.98 F.T.E.) ...................................................................$130,276,140
Section 8.245. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Veterans' Commission
For the operations of Veterans' Homes and cemeteries, utilities, systems
furniture, and structural modifications
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ........................$299,099
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) .................................................... 4,149,402
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,448,501
Section 8.250. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri Veterans' Homes Fund
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304) ...................................$1

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 23
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund
From Missouri Veterans’ Homes Fund (1460) (with $20,018,276
one-time) .................................................................................................. 33,018,276
Total .........................................................................................................................$33,018,277
Section 8.255. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For the Divisions of Gaming and Bingo
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$20,758,665
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,737,408
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................22,496,073
For treatment, prevention, and support services for compulsive and
problem gamers
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ...................................................7,000,000
For prevention and education services
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ...................................................1,500,000
For adult psychiatric services
Expense and Equipment
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ...................................................2,500,000
For a digital mental health program for problematic gambling, delivered
through a single digital platform provider with a business location
in the State of Missouri that must offer no-cost, multilingual,
community and anonymous support for individuals and their
loved ones, provided that the platform must include dedicated
functionality for supporters, providing tailored resources to help
them assist those struggling with gambling addiction
From Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund (1245) ........................................... 850,000
Total (Not to exceed 227.75 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$34,346,073
Section 8.260. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For fringe benefits, including retirement contributions for members of
the Missouri Department of Transportation and Highway Patrol
Employees' Retirement System, and insurance premiums for

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 24
State Highway Patrol employees assigned to work under the
direction of the Gaming Commission
Personal Service .............................................................................................$9,517,152
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 631,152
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................10,148,304
For the enforcement of sports wagering provided under Article III
Section 39(g) of the Constitution of the state of Missouri
Personal Service
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 308,520
Total (Not to exceed 3.00 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$10,456,824
Section 8.265. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount that
is credited to the Gaming Commission Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ......................................................................$100,000
Section 8.270. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount
received for bingo fees
From Bingo Proceeds for Education Fund (1289) ............................................................$5,000
Section 8.275. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For refunding any overpayment or erroneous payment of any amount that
is credited to the Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund
From Gaming Proceeds for Education Fund (1285) .......................................................$50,000
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Sports
Wagering Proceeds for Education Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ............................................................. 6,805,078
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,855,078
Section 8.280. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Gaming Commission
For breeding incentive payments
From Missouri Breeders Fund (1605)...............................................................................$5,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 25
Section 8.285. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) .................................................................$11,000,000
Section 8.290. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Missouri National Guard Trust Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................$4,000,000
Section 8.295. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the Access
Missouri Financial Assistance Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ...................................................................$5,000,000
Section 8.300. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Compulsive Gamblers Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) ......................................................................$194,181
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the
Compulsive Gaming Prevention Fund
From Gaming Commission Fund (1286) (including $6,500,000
one-time) .................................................................................................. 11,500,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$11,694,181
Section 8.305. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For Administration and Emergency Operations, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,323,855
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 203,168
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,527,023
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,488,656
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 909,819
From State Emergency Management (1145) ...............................................................3,398,475
Personal Service ...............................................................................................1,841,025

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 26
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,059,874
From Department of Health and Senior Services Federal Fund (1143) ......................2,900,899
Personal Service ..................................................................................................355,278
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,350
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663) ..............................................................................382,628
Personal Service ..................................................................................................206,361
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 130,344
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587) ...................................... 336,705
Total (Not to exceed 93.49 F.T.E.) ...........................................................................$9,545,730
Section 8.310. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Missouri Disaster Medical Assistance Team
Personal Service ................................................................................................$263,107
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 100,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 12.00 F.T.E.) .............................$363,107
Section 8.315. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Missouri Task Force 1
For expenses of Missouri Task Force 1, a division of the Boone County
Fire Protection District, when it responds to emergencies and
disasters in the State of Missouri and conducts annual training
and exercises. These expenses may include, but are not limited to
personnel salaries and benefits, supplies, and repair or
replacement of damaged equipment, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.335
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $175,000 one-time) ..........................$400,000
Section 8.320. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency
For the Community Right-to-Know Act
From Chemical Emergency Preparedness Fund (1587) ...............................................$750,000
For local emergency planning commissions to implement the federal
Hazardous Materials Transportation Uniform Safety Act of 1990
From State Emergency Management (1145) ....................................................... 595,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$1,345,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 27
Section 8.325. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency, provided five percent
(5%) flexibility is allowed between subsections within this
section
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for administrative
and training expenses of the State Emergency Management
Agency and for first responder training programs, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
8.335
From State Emergency Management (1145) ...........................................................$29,262,386
For all allotments, grants, and contributions from federal and other
sources that are deposited in the State Treasury for the use of the
State Emergency Management Agency for alleviating distress
from disasters
From Missouri Disaster Fund (1663) ....................................................................1,101,213,964
For matching funds for federal grants and for emergency assistance
expenses of the State Emergency Management Agency as
provided in Section 44.032, RSMo
Personal Service ....................................................................................................48,548
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 40,000,000
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................40,048,548
For expenses of non-declared disasters to include response, recovery, or
mitigation activities, and preparation and planning to local
emergency planning commissions, districts, and management
agencies
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................1,000,000
For expenses of any state agency responding during a declared
emergency at the direction of the governor provided the services
furnish immediate aid and relief
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ................................................................... 3,190,729
Total ....................................................................................................................$1,174,715,627
Section 8.330. To the Department of Public Safety
For the State Emergency Management Agency

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 28
For resource sharing through mutual aid agreements at the direction of
the governor
Personal Service and/or Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 8.335. To the Department of Public Safety
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Section 8.500. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Administration, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,946,445
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 183,059
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,129,504
Expense and Equipment, all expenditures must be in compliance
with the United States Department of Justice Equitable Sharing
Program guidelines
From Federal Drug Seizure Fund (1141) ............................................................. 240,944
Total (Not to exceed 28.48 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$2,370,448
Section 8.505. To the Department of the National Guard
For activities in support of the Missouri National Guard, including the
National Guard Tuition Assistance Program and the Military
Honors Program, provided three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service ..................................................................................................$54,447
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,343,965
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,398,412
Personal Service ...............................................................................................2,200,632
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 3,201,247
From Missouri National Guard Trust Fund (1900) .............................................. 5,401,879
Total (Not to exceed 43.40 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$8,800,291

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 29
Section 8.510. To the Department of the National Guard
For deployment of the National Guard to support security operations for
the 2026 World Cup, twenty-five percent (25%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment in
this section
Personal Service (one-time) ..............................................................................$957,000
Expense and Equipment (one-time) ......................................................... 714,720
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 8.34 F.T.E.)
(one-time) .......................................................................................................$1,671,720
Section 8.515. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Veterans Recognition Program
Personal Service ................................................................................................$143,546
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 200,000
From Veterans Commission Capital Improvement Trust Fund (1304)
(Not to exceed 3.00 F.T.E.) ...............................................................................$343,546
Section 8.520. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Field Support, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service .............................................................................................$1,301,335
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,901,217
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................3,202,552
Personal Service ..................................................................................................150,504
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 98,417
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................... 248,921
Total (Not to exceed 42.37 F.T.E.) ............................................................................$3,451,473
Section 8.525. To the Department of the National Guard
For operational expenses at armories from armory rental fees
Expense and Equipment
From Adjutant General Revolving Fund (1530) .............................................................$55,000
Section 8.530. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Missouri Military Family Relief Program
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri Military Family Relief Fund (1719).......................................................$10,000

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 30
For grants to family members of the National Guard and reservists who
are in financial need
From Missouri Military Family Relief Fund (1719)............................................ 140,000
Total ..............................................................................................................................$150,000
Section 8.535. To the Department of the National Guard
For training site operating costs
From Missouri National Guard Training Site Fund (1269) ..........................................$330,000
Section 8.540. To the Department of the National Guard
For Missouri Military Forces Contract Services, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Personal Service ................................................................................................$642,346
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 27,773
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................670,119
Personal Service .............................................................................................21,094,367
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 16,814,816
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ............................................................37,909,183
Personal Service
From Missouri National Guard Training Site Fund (1269) ..............................................30,361
Expense and Equipment
From Missouri National Guard Trust Fund (1900) .........................................................673,938
For refund of federal overpayments to the state for the Contract Services
Program
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ...................................................... 865,561
Total (Not to exceed 397.80 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$40,159,162
Section 8.545. To the Department of the National Guard
For the Office of Air Search and Rescue, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 8.550
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$65,743
Section 8.550. To the Department of the National Guard
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 2008 31
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
PART 2
Section 8.2005. To the Department of Public Safety
In reference to Part 1 of this act:
No funds shall be spent for any flight on a state aircraft where an
elected official, a member of a state board, or a member of a state
commission will be on board without a flight plan being made
publicly available via a global aviation data services organization
that operates both a website and mobile application which
provides free flight tracking of both private and commercial
aircraft.
PART 3
Section 8.3005. To the Department of Public Safety
In reference to Section 8.325 of Part 1 of this act: The Department
of Public Safety shall notify the General Assembly on a monthly
basis of the status of disaster payments. Such notification shall
include, but not limited to completed disaster payments and
disaster payments outstanding.
Department of Public Safety Totals
General Revenue Fund (498.21 F.T.E.) .................................................................$172,220,159
Federal Funds (113.46 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................1,300,688,898
Other Funds (4,077.13 F.T.E.) ............................................................................. 610,788,579
Total (4,688.80 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................$2,083,697,636
Department of National Guard Totals
General Revenue Fund (89.95 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$11,138,051
Federal Funds (388.12 F.T.E.) ...................................................................................38,399,048
Other Funds (45.32 F.T.E.) .................................................................................. 6,984,724
Total (523.39 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................................$56,521,823
